apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="gar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/et__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>           <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>           <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>           <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otten</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettin</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettin</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettin</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gr/eet__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>          <r>eet<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>          <r>eet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eets</l>         <r>eet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>           <r>eet<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utten</l>        <r>eet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eetin</l>        <r>eet<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eetin</l>        <r>eet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eetin</l>        <r>eet<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/yang__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aed</l>          <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aed</l>          <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yangin</l>       <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yangin</l>       <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yangin</l>       <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="drap__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ped</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ped</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hap__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pit</l>          <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pit</l>          <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pin</l>          <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pin</l>          <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pin</l>          <r>yang<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="haud__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hear__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="keep__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/at__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>           <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>           <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ats</l>          <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uit</l>          <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atten</l>        <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>attin</l>        <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>attin</l>        <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>attin</l>        <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="le/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>            <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>            <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>           <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>           <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>           <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ain</l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ain</l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ain</l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="drap">              <i>drap</i><par n="drap__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gar">               <i>gar</i><par n="gar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="get">               <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="greet">             <i>gr</i><par n="gr/eet__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gyang">             <i>g</i><par n="g/yang__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hap">               <i>hap</i><par n="hap__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="haud">              <i>haud</i><par n="haud__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hear">              <i>hear</i><par n="hear__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lat">               <i>l</i><par n="l/at__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lea">               <i>le</i><par n="le/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uphoud">            <i>uphaud</i><par n="haud__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="keep">             <i>keep</i><par n="keep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="haud yer wheesht"> <i>haud<b/>yer<b/>wheesht</i><par n="haud__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="loss the tattie"> <i>loss<b/>the<b/>tattie</i><par n="haud__vblex"/></e>
